etc/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX c4 Y 384
SFX c4 er er/54 er 54
SFX c4 er ant/8 [^cg]er 41
SFX c4 écer éçant/8 écer 41
SFX c4 éger égeant/8 éger 41
SFX c4 ébrer èbre/33 ébrer 39
SFX c4 écer èce/33 écer 39
SFX c4 écher èche/33 écher 39
SFX c4 écrer ècre/33 écrer 39
SFX c4 éder ède/33 éder 39
SFX c4 éger ège/33 éger 39
SFX c4 égler ègle/33 égler 39
SFX c4 égner ègne/33 égner 39
SFX c4 égrer ègre/33 égrer 39
SFX c4 éguer ègue/33 éguer 39
SFX c4 éler èle/33 éler 39
SFX c4 émer ème/33 émer 39
SFX c4 éner ène/33 éner 39
SFX c4 éper èpe/33 éper 39
SFX c4 équer èque/33 équer 39
SFX c4 érer ère/33 érer 39
SFX c4 éser èse/33 éser 39
SFX c4 éter ète/33 éter 39
SFX c4 étrer ètre/33 étrer 39
SFX c4 évrer èvre/33 évrer 39
SFX c4 éyer èye/33 éyer 39
SFX c4 er è/24 er 117
SFX c4 ébrer èbres/24 ébrer 40
SFX c4 écer èces/24 écer 40
SFX c4 écher èches/24 écher 40
SFX c4 écrer ècres/24 écrer 40
SFX c4 éder èdes/24 éder 40
SFX c4 éger èges/24 éger 40
SFX c4 égler ègles/24 égler 40
SFX c4 égner ègnes/24 égner 40
SFX c4 égrer ègres/24 égrer 40
SFX c4 éguer ègues/24 éguer 40
SFX c4 éler èles/24 éler 40
SFX c4 émer èmes/24 émer 40
SFX c4 éner ènes/24 éner 40
SFX c4 éper èpes/24 éper 40
SFX c4 équer èques/24 équer 40
SFX c4 érer ères/24 érer 40
SFX c4 éser èses/24 éser 40
SFX c4 éter ètes/24 éter 40
SFX c4 étrer ètres/24 étrer 40
SFX c4 évrer èvres/24 évrer 40
SFX c4 éyer èyes/24 éyer 40
SFX c4 er ons/16 [^cg]er 46
SFX c4 écer éçons/16 écer 46
SFX c4 éger égeons/16 éger 46
SFX c4 er ez/13 er 61
SFX c4 ébrer èbrent/8 ébrer 35
SFX c4 écer ècent/8 écer 35
SFX c4 écher èchent/8 écher 35
SFX c4 écrer ècrent/8 écrer 35
SFX c4 éder èdent/8 éder 35
SFX c4 éger ègent/8 éger 35
SFX c4 égler èglent/8 égler 35
SFX c4 égner ègnent/8 égner 35
SFX c4 égrer ègrent/8 égrer 35
SFX c4 éguer èguent/8 éguer 35
SFX c4 éler èlent/8 éler 35
SFX c4 émer èment/8 émer 35
SFX c4 éner ènent/8 éner 35
SFX c4 éper èpent/8 éper 35
SFX c4 équer èquent/8 équer 35
SFX c4 érer èrent/8 érer 35
SFX c4 éser èsent/8 éser 35
SFX c4 éter ètent/8 éter 35
SFX c4 étrer ètrent/8 étrer 35
SFX c4 évrer èvrent/8 évrer 35
SFX c4 éyer èyent/8 éyer 35
SFX c4 er ais/19 [^cg]er 53
SFX c4 écer éçais/19 écer 53
SFX c4 éger égeais/19 éger 53
SFX c4 er ait/8 [^cg]er 43
SFX c4 écer éçait/8 écer 43
SFX c4 éger égeait/8 éger 43
SFX c4 er ions/16 er 66
SFX c4 er iez/13 er 65
SFX c4 er aient/8 [^cg]er 44
SFX c4 écer éçaient/8 écer 44
SFX c4 éger égeaient/8 éger 44
SFX c4 er ai/19 [^cg]er 87
SFX c4 écer éçai/19 écer 87
SFX c4 éger égeai/19 éger 87
SFX c4 er as/24 [^cg]er 86
SFX c4 écer éças/24 écer 86
SFX c4 éger égeas/24 éger 86
SFX c4 er a/8 [^cg]er 55
SFX c4 écer éça/8 écer 55
SFX c4 éger égea/8 éger 55
SFX c4 er âmes/16 [^cg]er 49
SFX c4 écer éçâmes/16 écer 49
SFX c4 éger égeâmes/16 éger 49
SFX c4 er âtes/13 [^cg]er 48
SFX c4 écer éçâtes/13 écer 48
SFX c4 éger égeâtes/13 éger 48
SFX c4 er èrent/8 er 62
SFX c4 er erai/19 er 33
SFX c4 ébrer èbrerai/19 ébrer 33
SFX c4 écer ècerai/19 écer 33
SFX c4 écher ècherai/19 écher 33
SFX c4 écrer ècrerai/19 écrer 33
SFX c4 éder èderai/19 éder 33
SFX c4 éger ègerai/19 éger 33
SFX c4 égler èglerai/19 égler 33
SFX c4 égner ègnerai/19 égner 33
SFX c4 égrer ègrerai/19 égrer 33
SFX c4 éguer èguerai/19 éguer 33
SFX c4 éler èlerai/19 éler 33
SFX c4 émer èmerai/19 émer 33
SFX c4 éner ènerai/19 éner 33
SFX c4 éper èperai/19 éper 33
SFX c4 équer èquerai/19 équer 33
SFX c4 érer èrerai/19 érer 33
SFX c4 éser èserai/19 éser 33
SFX c4 éter èterai/19 éter 33
SFX c4 étrer ètrerai/19 étrer 33
SFX c4 évrer èvrerai/19 évrer 33
SFX c4 éyer èyerai/19 éyer 33
SFX c4 er eras/24 er 32
SFX c4 ébrer èbreras/24 ébrer 32
SFX c4 écer èceras/24 écer 32
SFX c4 écher ècheras/24 écher 32
SFX c4 écrer ècreras/24 écrer 32
SFX c4 éder èderas/24 éder 32
SFX c4 éger ègeras/24 éger 32
SFX c4 égler ègleras/24 égler 32
SFX c4 égner ègneras/24 égner 32
SFX c4 égrer ègreras/24 égrer 32
SFX c4 éguer ègueras/24 éguer 32
SFX c4 éler èleras/24 éler 32
SFX c4 émer èmeras/24 émer 32
SFX c4 éner èneras/24 éner 32
SFX c4 éper èperas/24 éper 32
SFX c4 équer èqueras/24 équer 32
SFX c4 érer èreras/24 érer 32
SFX c4 éser èseras/24 éser 32
SFX c4 éter èteras/24 éter 32
SFX c4 étrer ètreras/24 étrer 32
SFX c4 évrer èvreras/24 évrer 32
SFX c4 éyer èyeras/24 éyer 32
SFX c4 er era/8 er 23
SFX c4 ébrer èbrera/8 ébrer 23
SFX c4 écer ècera/8 écer 23
SFX c4 écher èchera/8 écher 23
SFX c4 écrer ècrera/8 écrer 23
SFX c4 éder èdera/8 éder 23
SFX c4 éger ègera/8 éger 23
SFX c4 égler èglera/8 égler 23
SFX c4 égner ègnera/8 égner 23
SFX c4 égrer ègrera/8 égrer 23
SFX c4 éguer èguera/8 éguer 23
SFX c4 éler èlera/8 éler 23
SFX c4 émer èmera/8 émer 23
SFX c4 éner ènera/8 éner 23
SFX c4 éper èpera/8 éper 23
SFX c4 équer èquera/8 équer 23
SFX c4 érer èrera/8 érer 23
SFX c4 éser èsera/8 éser 23
SFX c4 éter ètera/8 éter 23
SFX c4 étrer ètrera/8 étrer 23
SFX c4 évrer èvrera/8 évrer 23
SFX c4 éyer èyera/8 éyer 23
SFX c4 er erons/16 er 28
SFX c4 ébrer èbrerons/16 ébrer 28
SFX c4 écer ècerons/16 écer 28
SFX c4 écher ècherons/16 écher 28
SFX c4 écrer ècrerons/16 écrer 28
SFX c4 éder èderons/16 éder 28
SFX c4 éger ègerons/16 éger 28
SFX c4 égler èglerons/16 égler 28
SFX c4 égner ègnerons/16 égner 28
SFX c4 égrer ègrerons/16 égrer 28
SFX c4 éguer èguerons/16 éguer 28
SFX c4 éler èlerons/16 éler 28
SFX c4 émer èmerons/16 émer 28
SFX c4 éner ènerons/16 éner 28
SFX c4 éper èperons/16 éper 28
SFX c4 équer èquerons/16 équer 28
SFX c4 érer èrerons/16 érer 28
SFX c4 éser èserons/16 éser 28
SFX c4 éter èterons/16 éter 28
SFX c4 étrer ètrerons/16 étrer 28
SFX c4 évrer èvrerons/16 évrer 28
SFX c4 éyer èyerons/16 éyer 28
SFX c4 er erez/13 er 27
SFX c4 ébrer èbrerez/13 ébrer 27
SFX c4 écer ècerez/13 écer 27
SFX c4 écher ècherez/13 écher 27
SFX c4 écrer ècrerez/13 écrer 27
SFX c4 éder èderez/13 éder 27
SFX c4 éger ègerez/13 éger 27
SFX c4 égler èglerez/13 égler 27
SFX c4 égner ègnerez/13 égner 27
SFX c4 égrer ègrerez/13 égrer 27
SFX c4 éguer èguerez/13 éguer 27
SFX c4 éler èlerez/13 éler 27
SFX c4 émer èmerez/13 émer 27
SFX c4 éner ènerez/13 éner 27
SFX c4 éper èperez/13 éper 27
SFX c4 équer èquerez/13 équer 27
SFX c4 érer èrerez/13 érer 27
SFX c4 éser èserez/13 éser 27
SFX c4 éter èterez/13 éter 27
SFX c4 étrer ètrerez/13 étrer 27
SFX c4 évrer èvrerez/13 évrer 27
SFX c4 éyer èyerez/13 éyer 27
SFX c4 er eront/8 er 26
SFX c4 ébrer èbreront/8 ébrer 26
SFX c4 écer èceront/8 écer 26
SFX c4 écher ècheront/8 écher 26
SFX c4 écrer ècreront/8 écrer 26
SFX c4 éder èderont/8 éder 26
SFX c4 éger ègeront/8 éger 26
SFX c4 égler ègleront/8 égler 26
SFX c4 égner ègneront/8 égner 26
SFX c4 égrer ègreront/8 égrer 26
SFX c4 éguer ègueront/8 éguer 26
SFX c4 éler èleront/8 éler 26
SFX c4 émer èmeront/8 émer 26
SFX c4 éner èneront/8 éner 26
SFX c4 éper èperont/8 éper 26
SFX c4 équer èqueront/8 équer 26
SFX c4 érer èreront/8 érer 26
SFX c4 éser èseront/8 éser 26
SFX c4 éter èteront/8 éter 26
SFX c4 étrer ètreront/8 étrer 26
SFX c4 évrer èvreront/8 évrer 26
SFX c4 éyer èyeront/8 éyer 26
SFX c4 er erais/19 er 34
SFX c4 ébrer èbrerais/19 ébrer 34
SFX c4 écer ècerais/19 écer 34
SFX c4 écher ècherais/19 écher 34
SFX c4 écrer ècrerais/19 écrer 34
SFX c4 éder èderais/19 éder 34
SFX c4 éger ègerais/19 éger 34
SFX c4 égler èglerais/19 égler 34
SFX c4 égner ègnerais/19 égner 34
SFX c4 égrer ègrerais/19 égrer 34
SFX c4 éguer èguerais/19 éguer 34
SFX c4 éler èlerais/19 éler 34
SFX c4 émer èmerais/19 émer 34
SFX c4 éner ènerais/19 éner 34
SFX c4 éper èperais/19 éper 34
SFX c4 équer èquerais/19 équer 34
SFX c4 érer èrerais/19 érer 34
SFX c4 éser èserais/19 éser 34
SFX c4 éter èterais/19 éter 34
SFX c4 étrer ètrerais/19 étrer 34
SFX c4 évrer èvrerais/19 évrer 34
SFX c4 éyer èyerais/19 éyer 34
SFX c4 er erait/8 er 24
SFX c4 ébrer èbrerait/8 ébrer 24
SFX c4 écer ècerait/8 écer 24
SFX c4 écher ècherait/8 écher 24
SFX c4 écrer ècrerait/8 écrer 24
SFX c4 éder èderait/8 éder 24
SFX c4 éger ègerait/8 éger 24
SFX c4 égler èglerait/8 égler 24
SFX c4 égner ègnerait/8 égner 24
SFX c4 égrer ègrerait/8 égrer 24
SFX c4 éguer èguerait/8 éguer 24
SFX c4 éler èlerait/8 éler 24
SFX c4 émer èmerait/8 émer 24
SFX c4 éner ènerait/8 éner 24
SFX c4 éper èperait/8 éper 24
SFX c4 équer èquerait/8 équer 24
SFX c4 érer èrerait/8 érer 24
SFX c4 éser èserait/8 éser 24
SFX c4 éter èterait/8 éter 24
SFX c4 étrer ètrerait/8 étrer 24
SFX c4 évrer èvrerait/8 évrer 24
SFX c4 éyer èyerait/8 éyer 24
SFX c4 er erions/16 er 30
SFX c4 ébrer èbrerions/16 ébrer 30
SFX c4 écer ècerions/16 écer 30
SFX c4 écher ècherions/16 écher 30
SFX c4 écrer ècrerions/16 écrer 30
SFX c4 éder èderions/16 éder 30
SFX c4 éger ègerions/16 éger 30
SFX c4 égler èglerions/16 égler 30
SFX c4 égner ègnerions/16 égner 30
SFX c4 égrer ègrerions/16 égrer 30
SFX c4 éguer èguerions/16 éguer 30
SFX c4 éler èlerions/16 éler 30
SFX c4 émer èmerions/16 émer 30
SFX c4 éner ènerions/16 éner 30
SFX c4 éper èperions/16 éper 30
SFX c4 équer èquerions/16 équer 30
SFX c4 érer èrerions/16 érer 30
SFX c4 éser èserions/16 éser 30
SFX c4 éter èterions/16 éter 30
SFX c4 étrer ètrerions/16 étrer 30
SFX c4 évrer èvrerions/16 évrer 30
SFX c4 éyer èyerions/16 éyer 30
SFX c4 er eriez/13 er 29
SFX c4 ébrer èbreriez/13 ébrer 29
SFX c4 écer èceriez/13 écer 29
SFX c4 écher ècheriez/13 écher 29
SFX c4 écrer ècreriez/13 écrer 29
SFX c4 éder èderiez/13 éder 29
SFX c4 éger ègeriez/13 éger 29
SFX c4 égler ègleriez/13 égler 29
SFX c4 égner ègneriez/13 égner 29
SFX c4 égrer ègreriez/13 égrer 29
SFX c4 éguer ègueriez/13 éguer 29
SFX c4 éler èleriez/13 éler 29
SFX c4 émer èmeriez/13 émer 29
SFX c4 éner èneriez/13 éner 29
SFX c4 éper èperiez/13 éper 29
SFX c4 équer èqueriez/13 équer 29
SFX c4 érer èreriez/13 érer 29
SFX c4 éser èseriez/13 éser 29
SFX c4 éter èteriez/13 éter 29
SFX c4 étrer ètreriez/13 étrer 29
SFX c4 évrer èvreriez/13 évrer 29
SFX c4 éyer èyeriez/13 éyer 29
SFX c4 er eraient/8 er 25
SFX c4 ébrer èbreraient/8 ébrer 25
SFX c4 écer èceraient/8 écer 25
SFX c4 écher ècheraient/8 écher 25
SFX c4 écrer ècreraient/8 écrer 25
SFX c4 éder èderaient/8 éder 25
SFX c4 éger ègeraient/8 éger 25
SFX c4 égler ègleraient/8 égler 25
SFX c4 égner ègneraient/8 égner 25
SFX c4 égrer ègreraient/8 égrer 25
SFX c4 éguer ègueraient/8 éguer 25
SFX c4 éler èleraient/8 éler 25
SFX c4 émer èmeraient/8 émer 25
SFX c4 éner èneraient/8 éner 25
SFX c4 éper èperaient/8 éper 25
SFX c4 équer èqueraient/8 équer 25
SFX c4 érer èreraient/8 érer 25
SFX c4 éser èseraient/8 éser 25
SFX c4 éter èteraient/8 éter 25
SFX c4 étrer ètreraient/8 étrer 25
SFX c4 évrer èvreraient/8 évrer 25
SFX c4 éyer èyeraient/8 éyer 25
SFX c4 er asse/19 [^cg]er 59
SFX c4 écer éçasse/19 écer 59
SFX c4 éger égeasse/19 éger 59
SFX c4 er asses/24 [^cg]er 58
SFX c4 écer éçasses/24 écer 58
SFX c4 éger égeasses/24 éger 58
SFX c4 er ât/8 [^cg]er 45
SFX c4 écer éçât/8 écer 45
SFX c4 éger égeât/8 éger 45
SFX c4 er assions/16 [^cg]er 57
SFX c4 écer éçassions/16 écer 57
SFX c4 éger égeassions/16 éger 57
SFX c4 er assiez/13 [^cg]er 56
SFX c4 écer éçassiez/13 écer 56
SFX c4 éger égeassiez/13 éger 56
SFX c4 er assent/8 [^cg]er 52
SFX c4 écer éçassent/8 écer 52
SFX c4 éger égeassent/8 éger 52
SFX c4 ébrer èbre/41 ébrer 31
SFX c4 écer èce/41 écer 31
SFX c4 écher èche/41 écher 31
SFX c4 écrer ècre/41 écrer 31
SFX c4 éder ède/41 éder 31
SFX c4 éger ège/41 éger 31
SFX c4 égler ègle/41 égler 31
SFX c4 égner ègne/41 égner 31
SFX c4 égrer ègre/41 égrer 31
SFX c4 éguer ègue/41 éguer 31
SFX c4 éler èle/41 éler 31
SFX c4 émer ème/41 émer 31
SFX c4 éner ène/41 éner 31
SFX c4 éper èpe/41 éper 31
SFX c4 équer èque/41 équer 31
SFX c4 érer ère/41 érer 31
SFX c4 éser èse/41 éser 31
SFX c4 éter ète/41 éter 31
SFX c4 étrer ètre/41 étrer 31
SFX c4 évrer èvre/41 évrer 31
SFX c4 éyer èye/41 éyer 31
SFX c4 er ons/48 [^cg]er 47
SFX c4 écer éçons/48 écer 47
SFX c4 éger égeons/48 éger 47
SFX c4 er ez/36 er 63
